Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.030

Generally accepted accounting principles.

Unless otherwise provided for by rule of the director or other applicable rule or regulation, a state trust company shall conform to generally accepted accounting principles and applicable rules of the financial accounting standards board.

[ 2014 c 37 s 336.]